apertium-tam.tam.lexc
LEXICON VbEri
%<vblex%>%<inf%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:கிறாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறது # ;

%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறார்கள் # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ந்தேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ந்தாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ந்தான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ந்தாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ந்தது # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தனர் # ;


LEXICON VbEdu
%<vblex%>%<inf%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:க்கிறேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:க்கிறாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:க்கிறான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:க்கிறாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:க்கிறது # ;

%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:க்கிறீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:க்கிறார்கள் # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:த்தேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:த்தாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:த்தான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:த்தாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:த்தது # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ட்டோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:டீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:டார்கள் # ;


LEXICON VbPara
%<vblex%>%<inf%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:க்கிறேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:க்கிறாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:க்கிறான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:க்கிறாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:க்கிறது # ;

%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:க்கிறோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:க்கிறீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:க்கிறார்கள் # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ந்தேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ந்தாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:ந்தான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:ந்தாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:ந்தது # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தோ # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:ந்தனர் # ;


LEXICON VbVirumbu
%<vblex%>%<inf%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:கிறாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறது # ;

%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறார்கள் # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:இனேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:இனாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:இனான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:இனாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:இயது # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:இனோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:இனீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:இனார்கள் # ;


LEXICON VbAzhu
%<vblex%>%<inf%>: # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:கிறான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:கிறாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:கிறது # ;

%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<pres%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:கிறார்கள் # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<m%>%<sg%>:தேன் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:தாய் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<m%>%<sg%>:தான் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<f%>%<sg%>:தாள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<sg%>:துச்சு # ;

%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p1%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:தோம் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p2%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:தீர்கள் # ;
%<vblex%>%<past%>%<p3%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:தனர் # ;

LEXICON PronItgEnna
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<mf%>%<sp%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Pronouns

நான் PronPersNaan ;  ! "avan" ! "I"
நீங்கள் PronPersNeengal ;  ! "avan" ! "you"
அவன் PronPersAvan ;  ! "avan" ! "he""
அவர் PronPersAvar ;  ! "avan" ! "he"
அவள் PronPersAval ;  ! "avan" ! "she"
அவர்கள் PronPersAvarkal ;  ! "avan" ! "they"
அது PronDemAthu ;  ! "avan" ! "it"
இது PronDemAthu ;  ! "avan" ! "it"

என்ன PronItgEnna ; ! "enna" ! "what"
யார் PronItgEnna ; ! "yar" ! "who"

LEXICON Determiners

ஒரு DetIndSg ; ! "oru" ! "a"

LEXICON Numerals

ஒன்று Num ;  ! "onru" ! "one"
இரண்டு Num ;  ! "irandu" ! "two"
மூன்று Num ;  ! "moondru" ! "three"
நான்கு Num ;  ! "naanku" ! "four"
ஐந்து Num ;  ! "aindhu" ! "five"
ஆறு Num ;  ! "aaru" ! "six"
ஏழு Num ;  ! "yezhu" ! "seven"
எட்டு Num ;  ! "yettu" ! "eight"
ஒன்பது Num ;  ! "onpadhu" ! "nine"
பத்து Num ;  ! "paththu" ! "ten"
பதினொன்று Num ;  ! "pathinondru" ! "eleven"
பன்னிரண்டு Num ;  ! "pannirandu" ! "twelve"
பதின்மூன்று Num ;  ! "pathinmoondru" ! "thirteen"
பதினான்கு Num ;  ! "pathinaanku" ! "fourteen"
பதினைந்து Num ;  ! "pathinaindhu" ! "fifteen"
பதினாறு Num ;  ! "pathinaaru" ! "sixteen"
பதினேழு Num ;  ! "pathinezhu" ! "seventeen"
பதினெட்டு Num ;  ! "pathinettu" ! "eighteen"
பத்தொன்பது Num ;  ! "paththonpadhu" ! "nineteen"
இருபது Num ;  ! "irupathu" ! "twenty"

LEXICON Adverbs

அடிக்கடி Adv ;  ! "adikkadi" ! "frequently"
அண்மையில் Adv ;  ! "anmaiyil" ! "recently"
அநேகமாக Adv ;  ! "anekamaaka" ! "almost"
அப்பொழுது Adv ;  ! "appozhuthu" ! "then"
அபூர்வமாக Adv ;  ! "apoorvamaaga" ! "hardly"
அபூர்வமாய் Adv ;  ! "apoorvamaai" ! "seldom"
அரிதாய் Adv ;  ! "arithaai" ! "rarely"
அவ்விடம் Adv ;  ! "avvidam" ! "there"
ஆயினும் Adv ;  ! "aayinum" ! "yet"
இப்பொழுது Adv ;  ! "ippozhuthu" ! "now"
இப்பொழுதே Adv ;  ! "ippozhudhe" ! "right now"
இவ்விடம் Adv ;  ! "ivvidam" ! "here"
இன்றிரவு Adv ;  ! "inriravu" ! "tonight"
இன்று Adv ;  ! "inru" ! "today"
இன்னும் Adv ;  ! "innum" ! "still"
உடனடியாய் Adv ;  ! "udanadiyaai" ! "immediately"
உண்மையாக Adv ;  ! "unmaiyaaga" ! "really"
எங்குமின்றி Adv ;  ! "yenkumindri" ! "nowhere"
எப்பொழுதாவது Adv ;  ! "yeppozhuthaavathu" ! "occasionally"
எப்பொழுதும் Adv ;  ! "yeppozhuthum" ! "always"
ஏற்கெனவே Adv ;  ! "yerkenave" ! "already"
ஒன்றாய் Adv ;  ! "onraai" ! "together"
கடினமாக Adv ;  ! "kadinamaaga" ! "hard"
கவனமாக Adv ;  ! "kavanamaaga" ! "carefully"
தன்னந்தனியாக Adv ;  ! "thannanthaniyaaga" ! "alone"
தொலைவில் Adv ;  ! "tholaivil" ! "away"
நன்கு Adv ;  ! "nanku" ! "well"
நாளை Adv ;  ! "naalai" ! "tomorrow"
நேற்றிரவு Adv ;  ! "netriravu" ! "last night"
நேற்று Adv ;  ! "netru" ! "yesterday"
பிறகு Adv ;  ! "piraku" ! "later"
பெரும்பாலும் Adv ;  ! "perumpaalum" ! "mostly"
முற்றிலும் Adv ;  ! "murrilum" ! "quite"
முற்றிலுமாக Adv ;  ! "murrilumaaga" ! "absolutely"
முன்னர் Adv ;  ! "munnar" ! "ago"
மெதுவாக Adv ;  ! "medhuvaaga" ! "slowly"
வழக்கமாக Adv ;  ! "vazhakkamaaga" ! "usually"
விரைவில் Adv ;  ! "viraivil" ! "soon"
வெளியே Adv ;  ! "veliye" ! "out"
வேகமாக Adv ;  ! "vekamaaga" ! "fast, quickly"

LEXICON Punctuations

%"%<pquot%>:%" # ; 
%,%<cm%>:%, # ;
%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ; 
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON Verbs
எறி VbEri ; ! "eri" ! "throw"
வரை VbEri ; ! "varai" ! "draw"
விழு VbEri ; ! "vizhu" ! "fall"
கீழ்படி VbEri ; ! "keezhpadi" ! "obey"
உட்கார் VbEri ; ! "utkaar" ! "sit down"
குனி VbEri ; ! "kuni" ! "bend down"
நிமிர் VbEri ; ! "nimir" ! "become straight"
எடு VbEdu ; ! "edu" ! "take"
சுடு VbEdu ; ! "suttu" ! "burn"
சாப்பிடு VbEdu ; ! "saapidu" ! "eat"
கும்பிடு VbEdu ; ! "kumbidu" ! "pray"
விடு VbEdu ; ! "vidu" ! "leave"
போடு VbEdu ; ! "podu" ! "put"
கூப்பிடு VbEdu ; ! "koopidu" ! "call"
தொடு VbEdu ; ! "thodu" ! "touch"
படி VbEdu ; ! "padi" ! "read/study"
குளி VbEdu ; ! "kuli" ! "bathe"
குதி VbEdu ; ! "kudi" ! "jump"
சிரி VbEdu ; ! "siri" ! "laugh"
அடி VbEdu ; ! "adi" ! "beat"
கட்டிப்பிடி VbEdu ; ! "kattipidi" ! "hug"
கடி VbEdu ; ! "kadi" ! "bite"
சமை VbEdu ; ! "samai" ! "cook"
வகு VbEdu ; ! "vagu" ! "divide"
அலங்கரி VbEdu ; ! "alangari" ! "decorate"
கிழி VbEdu ; ! "kizhi" ! "tear"
அழி VbEdu ; ! "azhi" ! "erase"
பற VbPara ; ! "para" ! "fly"
திற VbPara ; ! "thira" ! "open"
நட VbPara ; ! "nada" ! "walk" 
மற VbPara ; ! "mara" ! "forget"
மித VbPara ; ! "midha" ! "float"
இரு VbPara ; ! "iru" ! "be"
விரும்பு VbVirumbu ; ! "virumbu" ! "like"
திரும்பு VbVirumbu ; ! "thirumbu" ! "turn"
எழுது VbVirumbu ; ! "ezhuthu" ! "write"
வாங்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "vaangu" ! "buy"
பேசு VbVirumbu ; ! "paesu" ! "speak"
தூங்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "thoongu" ! "sleep"
விளையாடு VbVirumbu ; ! "vilayaadu" ! "play"
தூக்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "thooku" ! "lift"
ஆட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "aatu" ! "shake"
பண்ணு VbVirumbu ; ! "pannu" ! "do"
கழுவு VbVirumbu ; ! "kazhuvu" ! "wash"
மூடு VbVirumbu ; ! "moodu" ! "close"
நீட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "neetu" ! "extend"
பின்னு VbVirumbu ; ! "pinnu" ! "knot"
விளக்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "vilakku" ! "separate"
ஆடு VbVirumbu ; ! "aadu" ! "dance"
சீறு VbVirumbu ; ! "seeru" ! "hiss"
அள்ளு VbVirumbu ; ! "allu" ! "gather in palms"
ஓடு VbVirumbu ; ! "odu" ! "run"
மூழ்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "moozhgu" ! "drown"
நிரப்பு VbVirumbu ; ! "nirappu" ! "fill"
நம்பு VbVirumbu ; ! "nambu" ! "trust"
விழுங்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "vizhungu" ! "swallow"
கொண்டாடு VbVirumbu ; ! "kondadu" ! "celebrate"
ஆகு VbVirumbu ; ! "aagu" ! "become"
துப்பு VbVirumbu ; ! "thuppu" ! "spit"
காப்பாற்று VbVirumbu ; ! "kaapaatru" ! "save"
எண்ணு VbVirumbu ; ! "ennu" ! "count"
தள்ளு VbVirumbu ; ! "thallu" ! "push"
வெட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "vettu" ! "cut"
உடுத்து VbVirumbu ; ! "udutthu" ! "wear"
வீசு VbVirumbu ; ! "veesu" ! "throw"
தோண்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "thondu" ! "dig"
தாண்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "thaandu" ! "jump over/go past"
ஏறு VbVirumbu ; ! "yeru" ! "climb"
இறங்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "irangu" ! "get down"
நொறுக்கு VbVirumbu ; ! "norukku" ! "crush"
ஒட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "ottu" ! "stick"
ஊட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "ootu" ! "feed"
காட்டு VbVirumbu ; ! "kaatu" ! "show"
அழு VbAzhu ; ! "azhu" ! "cry"
செய் VbAzhu ; ! "sey" ! "do"
பெய் VbAzhu ; ! "pey" ! "rain"
